Hawaii, session 2026, GM1247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that many licensed care
homes in central and leeward Oahu operate in aging facilities
and serve vulnerable populations, including kupuna, individuals
with disabilities, and medically fragile residents. These
facilities are particularly susceptible to damage from natural
disasters, climate-related hazards, and prolonged power outages.
Strengthening the physical infrastructure and disaster
resilience of these care homes is critical to safeguarding
resident health and safety, minimizing emergency response needs,
and supporting community stability and recovery.
The purpose of this Act is to establish the central and
leeward Oahu care home community resilience pilot program to
assist eligible licensed care home facilities within the 96797,
96792, and 96786 postal zip codes on the island of Oahu in
enhancing their resilience against natural disasters, climate-
related risks, and extended utility disruptions.
2026-3459 HB2498 GDI HMSO 1
iiiNiiiiiiniiiiniiiin

Page 2 2498
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. (a) The Hawaii emergency management agency
shall establish the central and leeward Oahu care home community
resilience pilot program.
(b) The purpose of the pilot program shall be to assist
eligible licensed care home facilities within the 96797, 96792,
and 96786 postal zip codes on the island of Oahu to implement
structural and operational resilience improvements; provided
that eligible structural and operational resilience improvements
may include but are not limited to;
(1) Roof reinforcement, hurricane clips, and
wind-resistant materials;
(2) Impact-resistant windows, storm shutters, and
strengthened doors;
(3) Backup power systems and battery storage for essential
medical equipment;
(4) Air filtration or cooling enhancements for extreme
heat or wildfire smoke;
(5) Fire-resistant landscaping and defensible space; and
(6) Shelter-in-place or safe room modifications.
(c) The pilot program may provide, as funds permit:
2026-3459 HB2498 CDl HMSO
IliWiilinilHHIIIIII

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) Grants, rebates, or contracted services for structure
hardening;
(2) Facility vulnerability assessments for wind, heat,
wildfire smoke, and power disruption risks;
(3) Technical assistance and training in preparedness and
continuity of operations; and
(4) Support for emergency power and cooling solutions for
medically fragile residents.
(d) The following care home facilities within the 96797,
96792, and 96786 postal zip codes on the island of Oahu shall be
eligible for the pilot program:
(1) Adult residential care homes;
(2) Expanded adult residential care homes;
(3) Community care foster family homes;
(4) Developmental disabilities domiciliary homes;
(5) Intermediate care facilities; and
(6) Any other licensed residential care home serving
vulnerable populations within the 96797, 96792, and
96786 postal zip codes on the island of Oahu.
(e) The pilot program shall prioritize assistance to care
home facilities that:
2026-3459 HB2498 CDl HMSO 3
liHIWIIIIIiliniHiMIIII

Page 4 2498
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(1) Serve low-income residents, kupuna, or persons with
disabilities;
(2) House residents dependent on life-sustaining medical
equipment;
(3) Are located in high-risk hazard zones;
(4) Operate in structures more than twenty-five years old;
and
(5) Demonstrate financial need.
(f) Each care home facility shall adopt an evacuation plan
for its residents and employees.
(g) The Hawaii emergency management agency shall submit a
report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the
convening of the regular session of 2027. The report shall
include:
(1) The number and types of care homes assisted;
(2) Completed assessments and improvements;
(3) Estimated reductions in disaster-related risks;
(4) Stakeholder feedback; and
(5) Recommendations for extending or expanding the pilot
program statewide, including proposed legislation.
2026-3459 HB2498 CDl HMSO
lllliililllliHHIIII

Page 5
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(h) The Hawaii emergency management agency may adopt rules
pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to implement
this Act.
(i) As used in this Act:
"Kupuna" means an individual who is sixty years of age or
older or who has specific care needs.
"Pilot program" means the central and leeward Oahu care.
home community resilience pilot program.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,000,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
central and leeward Oahu care home community resilience pilot
program pursuant to this Act.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii
emergency management agency for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, and
shall be repealed on June 30, 2029.
2026-3459 HB2498 CDl HMSO
luinnnniigiiiMiMNiH

2498
H.B. NO
±
C/5
d
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2026

HB No. 2498, HD 2, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2498, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
169-26